Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3809
Black-tailed prairie dog management
fund; authorized; use.

A
black-tailed prairie dog management fund may be established by a county, which
fund shall be available for expenses authorized to be paid from such fund,
including necessary expenses of the county board in carrying out its duties
and responsibilities under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 9.